Hawaii statutes.
§289-4 Issuance of license. The
director of finance shall file each application received by the director of
finance with the required fee and, when satisfied that the applicant, if an
individual, or each of the partners or principal officers of the applicant, if
a partnership or corporation, is of good moral character and that the
applicant, so far as can be ascertained, has complied with and will comply with
this chapter and the laws of the State relating to registration of motor
vehicles, shall issue to the applicant a license permitting the applicant to
engage in the business described in the applicant's application, at the address
or addresses therein specified until June 30 next following the date of
issuance of the license unless sooner terminated, suspended, or revoked. All
applications for renewal of license shall be filed on or before June 30 of each
year together with the applicable fees. [L 1967, c 277, §5; HRS §289-4; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next